California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
The regulations are exempt from provisions of Section 11380 of the Government Code. They may, however, be filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 11385 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4503.

No fair shall receive any apportionment of funds pursuant to this part unless it complies with the regulations of the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4504.

The department may at any time examine the books and records of any fair to determine the correctness of any statement or report which is filed with the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4505.

Every fair within the network of California fairs that conducts a fair for which any apportionment is sought shall file a detailed statement of its operations in the previous fiscal year with the department within 90 days of the end of that fiscal year. The content and form of the statement shall be prescribed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 341, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4506.

The department shall review the statements of operation which are filed by the several fairs pursuant to Section 4505. It shall consider such reports, statistics and other information as to the conduct, operation, management of, and other matters which relate to such fairs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4507.

The department may classify, and shall consider, at least once every five years, whether to classify or reclassify, fairs that are required to file reports pursuant to Section 4505. The department may
 request advice and recommendations
 from boards of directors of fairs for this purpose. In making classifications, the department may, in addition, take into consideration factors that may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) The type and class of agricultural, including livestock, industrial, and natural resources that are exhibited, and the amount of premiums
 that are paid in accordance with the approved premium list of the fair.

(b) Whether the fair is regional in nature, offers a special feature for agriculture, livestock, or industry, or is a sectional fair limiting exhibits to the region in which the fair is held, and
 any
 other characteristics and factors that the department deems necessary.

(c) The ratio of attendance at the fair to the population of the area that is served by it.

(d) The efficiency of management, including operational procedures, revenue from sources other than the state, quality of exhibits, and community interest in the fair.

(e) The extent and nature of interim utilization of fair property as promoted by the fair
 management.

(f) The need of the fair for money from state sources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 198, Sec. 1.   (AB 1800)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4508.

The classifications of fairs established pursuant to Section 4507 may be considered in determining the basis of compensation to fair managers of fairs that are classified under those provisions.

The department shall annually perform all of the following:

(a) Review and maintain a separate and accurate job description for each fair manager.

(b) Solicit information from fair board of directors that will accurately describe the fair managers performance and responsibilities in regard to merit salary increases for its fair manager.

(c) Annually report its findings to fair directors and fair managers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1214, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

4510.

The department shall prepare a manual setting forth the powers, duties, and responsibilities of directors of county and citrus fruit fairs, and a separate manual setting forth the powers, duties, and responsibilities of directors of district and combined county and district fairs. The department shall also:

(a) Revise the manuals annually.

(b) Provide copies of the manuals to each director and manager of every county, district, combined county and district, and citrus fruit fair.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

4511.

(a) All county fairs and citrus fruit fairs shall, prior to entering into a carnival contract, do both of the following:

(1) Notify all persons on the department’s list of qualified carnival contractors of the contract opportunity at least 180 days prior to entering into the contract.

(2) Provide all applicants for the carnival contract a hearing before the board or governing authority on their proposal.

(b) If a county fair or citrus fruit fair enters into a carnival contract with a person other than the highest bidder, it shall submit a justification for that action to the department.

(c) No county fair or citrus fruit fair shall enter into a carnival contract for a term which exceeds three years without the approval of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 290, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4511.1.

For the purposes of this chapter, “carnival” is defined as a company of transportable amusement rides, food and beverage units, and games that may have one or more owners and travels from place to place, in a group or separately, providing entertainment and recreation to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 36, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4511.2.

For the purposes of this chapter, “carnival workers” are defined as employees of a carnival.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 36, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4511.5.

If carnival incident or accident records are required as conditions to contracts between carnival contractors and district agricultural associations, county fairs, or citrus fruit fairs, the department shall maintain and review carnival contractor’s accident reports submitted by the Division of Occupational Safety and Health in the Department of Industrial Relations to the department and disseminate information regarding these reports to district agricultural associations, county fairs, and citrus fruit fairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1105, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4512.

(a) The department shall assist each fair in the development of a long-term maintenance schedule, subject to annual review by the department. The review is for the purpose of ensuring that the schedule is established so individual project costs, project descriptions, and projected completion dates are readily available for public agency review.

(b) The department shall develop an appeal process which allows individual fairs to request funding for projects and to present information concerning needed projects at their fairgrounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1018, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

4513.

(a) The department may expend funds for promotional and public relations purposes for the California Exposition and State Fair.

(b) The California Exposition and State Fair may expend funds for promotional and public relations purposes of the fair.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 290, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Fairs Allocation and Classification Committee [4531. - 4535.]

4531.

The Fairs Allocation and Classification Committee is continued in existence. It consists of seven Members of the Senate and seven Members of the Assembly.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4532.

To the extent that it is feasible, appointments to the committee shall be so made that there is one Member of the Senate and one Member of the Assembly on the committee from each of the following areas:

Area 1. Siskiyou, Modoc, Trinity, Shasta, Lassen, Tehama, Plumas, and Sierra Counties.

Area 2. Butte, Yuba, Sutter, Glenn, Colusa, Yolo, Sacramento, and Solano Counties.

Area 3. Del Norte, Humboldt, Mendocino, Lake, Sonoma, Napa, and Marin Counties.

Area 4. El Dorado, Amador, Calaveras, Tuolumne, Mariposa, Nevada, and Placer Counties.

Area 5. San Joaquin, Stanislaus, Merced, Madera, Fresno, Kings, Tulare, and Kern Counties.

Area 6. San Francisco, Contra Costa, Alameda, San Mateo, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, San Benito, Monterey, and San Luis Obispo Counties.

Area 7. Santa Barbara, Ventura, Los Angeles, Orange, San Diego, Imperial, San Bernardino, Inyo, Mono, Alpine, and Riverside Counties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4533.

The committee shall, from time to time, elect its chairman and vice chairman. The committee may meet at any time, whether or not the Legislature is in session, and shall continue in existence until otherwise provided by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4534.

(a) The committee shall investigate, study, and analyze, when it deems it necessary, any or all facts and matters relating to the operation and financing of fairs that are subject to this division and the effect and operation of the laws relating thereto.

(b) The committee shall regularly review the administration of the Fair and Exposition Fund by the department and make recommendations to improve efficiency and economy in the operation of all fairs.

(c) The committee shall seek methods whereby private financing can be secured for support of all local fairs.

(d) The committee shall regularly review
 the capability of the department to administer and supervise the allocation of moneys from the Fair and Exposition Fund to all local fairs.

(e) The committee shall make recommendations to the Legislature regarding the establishment of new district agricultural associations or local fairs.

(f) The committee shall regularly review the criteria for the classification of fairs specified by Section 4507 and make recommendations for changes whenever appropriate.

(g) The committee shall encourage, where feasible, the conduct on a regular basis of joint or combined fairs pursuant to Section 4441.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 68.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4535.

The committee shall report to the Legislature at the commencement of each regular session and may report to the Legislature at any time, including in such reports its recommendations, if any, as to necessary or desirable legislative action. The provisions of the Joint Rules of the Senate and Assembly, as they may exist from time to time, which relate to joint investigating committees apply to the committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. CITRUS FRUIT FAIRS [4601. - 4703.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [4601. - 4603.]

4601.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4602.

“Association” means a nonprofit corporation organized and existing under the laws of this state for the purpose of and which engages in conducting and carrying on a citrus fruit fair.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4603.

“Citrus fruit fair” means any citrus fruit fair or citrus fruit fair and exposition which satisfies all of the following requirements:

(a) Has been conducted and carried on by an association for not less than four or more than 15 consecutive days during each calendar year for a period of not less than 20 consecutive years.

(b) Citrus fruits are exhibited for prizes and premiums at the fair. The fair has for its purpose the promotion and encouragement of the citrus fruit industry of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 207, Sec. 2.   Effective July 26, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Powers and Duties [4701. - 4703.]

4701.

An association that conducts and carries on any citrus fruit fair that is eligible to receive apportionments pursuant to this division:

(a) Has the same power as a district agricultural association to construct, maintain, and operate recreational and cultural facilities of general public interest.

(b) Is an instrumentality of the state for the purposes mentioned in subdivision (a) and in Section 4603.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 71.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4702.

Upon dissolution of any such association, all of its property, after payment of outstanding debts, shall escheat to the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4703.

All property of any such association which is used exclusively in conducting citrus fruit fairs, and its recreational and cultural facilities which are of general public interest, are exempt from taxation. No affidavit need be filed to claim this exemption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4. PLANT QUARANTINE AND PEST CONTROL [5001. - 8808.]



PART 1. GENERALLY [5001. - 6299.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions and General Provisions [5001. - 5035.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [5001. - 5012.]

5001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.

“Appliance” means any box, tray, container, ladder, tent, vehicle, implement, or any other article which is, or may be, used in connection with the growing, harvesting, handling, or transportation of any agricultural commodity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.

“Crop seed” means the seed or seedlike fruit of grain, beans, flax, beets, onions, or any other crop, whether or not it is intended for planting purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5004.

“Noxious weed” means any species of plant that is, or is liable to be, troublesome, aggressive, intrusive, detrimental, or destructive to agriculture, silviculture, or important native species, and difficult to control or eradicate, which the director, by regulation, designates to be a noxious weed. In determining whether or not a species shall be designated a noxious weed for the purposes of protecting silviculture or important native plant species, the director shall not make that designation if the designation will be detrimental to agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 556, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5005.

“Nursery stock” means any plant for planting, propagation, or ornamentation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.

“Pest” means any of the following things that is, or is liable to be, dangerous or detrimental to the agricultural industry of the state:

(a) Any infectious, transmissible, or contagious disease of any plant, or any disorder of any plant which manifests symptoms or behavior which the director, after investigation and hearing, finds and determines is characteristic of an infectious, transmissible, or contagious disease.

(b) Any form of animal life.

(c) Any form of vegetable life.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5007.

“Plant” includes any part of a plant, tree, plant product, shrub, vine, fruit, vegetable, seed, bulb, stolon, tuber, corm, pip, cutting, scion, bud, graft, or fruit pit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.

“Shipment” means any article or thing which is, may be, or has been transported from one place to another place.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5009.

“Horticultural product” means those products as stated in Group Number 18 of the Standard Industrial Classification Manual which are grown under cover or outdoors, including bulbs, flowers, shrubbery, florist greens, fruit stock, floral products, nursery stock, ornamental plants, potted plants, roses, seed, sod, fruits, food crops grown in greenhouses, vegetables, and horticultural specialties not otherwise specified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 380, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5010.

Agricultural or farm products include any horticultural product.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 380, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5011.

Unless otherwise provided in this code, for the purposes of pest management, “crop” means a plant or animal, or a product derived from a plant or animal, that can be grown and harvested for profit or for the subsistence of humans or animals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 414, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5012.

Unless otherwise provided in this code, for the purposes of pest management, “forage” means food for domestic or other wild animals that is taken by browsing or grazing, or food that wild or domestic animals take for themselves.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 414, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [5021. - 5029.]

5021.

Unless otherwise provided, any treatment which may be required pursuant to this division is at the risk and at the expense of the owner or person in charge or in possession of the property which is treated at the time of treatment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5022.

This division shall not be construed to conflict with any other law which provides for the extermination or control of ground squirrels or other animal pests. If any proceedings are commenced, however, pursuant to this division, this division and no other law applies to such proceedings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5023.

The commissioner, whenever necessary, may enter and make an inspection of any premises, plant, conveyance, or thing in his jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5024.

(a) The secretary or the commissioner shall, during the maintenance of any quarantine established by the secretary pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 5301) of Chapter 5, inspect any plant or thing that is, or is liable to be, infested or infected by, or which might act as a carrier of, any pest. The person who conducts the inspection shall not permit any of those plants or things to pass over the quarantine line during the quarantine, except pursuant to a certificate of inspection and release that is signed by that person.

(b) Whenever the commissioner finds that a plant or thing does not, and will not, present a threat to the state, the commissioner may recommend to the secretary the waiver of, and the secretary may waive, the inspection and certification requirements specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 214, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

5025.

The Regents of the University of California may collect and, subject to the provisions of Section 6305, import into this state from foreign countries, parasitic and predaceous insects for use in the control of insect pests of horticultural and agricultural crops and of livestock. The regents may, for this purpose, employ and send abroad experts who shall be allowed, in addition to their compensation, their necessary subsistence, traveling, and other expenses incidental to the performance of their duties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5025.5.

(a) The department, in consultation with the University of California, the United States Department of Agriculture, and members of the scientific community with expertise in exotic pest managment, shall conduct a study on the desirability and feasibility of establishing an Exotic Pest Research Containment Facility, which shall, as a primary function, conduct exotic pest research and perform additional activities with respect to the administration, training, service, and diagnostics relating to exotic pests. The research of the facility shall emphasize flexibility and adaptability to accommodate technological advances and research into new exotic pest problem areas. The study shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The availability of funding for the facility from federal, state, local, and private sources.

(2) Whether to locate the facility within or outside of California.

(3) Protocol for access to and operation of the facility.

(b) The department shall report its findings and recommendations to the Legislature, not later than January 1, 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 721, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5026.

(a) The director may overrule a local agency’s ordinance or regulation where that ordinance or regulation would prevent or inhibit an eradication effort. The director may act under this section only when the Governor has declared a state of emergency relating to the eradication effort and the effect of the local ordinance or regulation will be to threaten agriculture on a statewide basis, to materially interfere with the ability of the director or the commissioner to eradicate a pest, or where the pest is of such a nature that it could rapidly spread to other areas beyond the boundaries of the local agency.

(b) “Local agency” means any public agency, other than a state agency, board, or commission and includes, but is not limited to, cities (chartered or otherwise), counties, and special districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5027.

Unless otherwise expressly provided, a violation of any provision of this division is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 899, Sec. 1.   Effective September 13, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5028.

(a) Any person who intentionally violates any state or federal quarantine law or regulation is liable civilly as provided in Sections 5310 and 5311, and subdivision (c) of this section, and is subject to criminal or civil penalties, or both, pursuant to the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7) of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) Either of the following factual findings shall constitute prima facie evidence that a violation of any state or federal quarantine law or regulation pursuant to subdivision (a) is an intentional violation:

(1) A violation of Section 6401 and possession of a shipment, plant, or thing that is regulated by a state or federal quarantine law or regulation and that has not been inspected and released by a federal, state, or county quarantine official in either of the following circumstances:

(A) The plant or thing is found concealed from view.

(B) The person in possession has been found repeatedly in possession of those plants or things.

(2) A combination of findings showing that a person is in possession of a shipment, plant, or thing that is regulated by a state or federal quarantine law or regulation and that was fraudulently or secretly brought into the state and the person in possession is engaged in a business or other commercial activity where a reasonable expectation exists that the person was aware of the state or federal quarantine laws or regulations.

(c) Any person who negligently or intentionally violates any state or federal law or regulation, including any quarantine regulation, by importing any plant, or other article, that, by virtue of being pest or disease infested, causes an infestation of a plant, pest, or disease, or causes an existing infestation to spread beyond any quarantine boundaries, is liable civilly in a sum not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each act that constitutes a violation of the law or regulation.

(d) The Attorney General, upon request of the secretary, shall petition the superior court to impose, assess, and recover the sum imposed pursuant to subdivision (c). In determining the amount to be imposed, the court shall take into consideration all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the extent of harm caused by the violation and the nature and persistence of the violation.

(e) The remedy under this section is in addition to, and does not supersede or limit, any and all other remedies, civil or criminal, that are otherwise available to the state.

(f) Any funds recovered pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund for emergency pest or disease exclusion, detection, eradication, or research of agricultural plant or animal pests or diseases. These funds may be allocated to cover costs related to the enforcement of this division. These funds are in addition to any funds appropriated for those purposes pursuant to Section 224.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 157, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

5029.

(a) The department, in consultation with the State Department of Health Services, shall design and implement a program to provide information to persons who reside in areas scheduled to be treated with pesticides on an emergency basis in order to eradicate plant pests.

(b) The purpose of this program is to provide information about the health effects of the pesticides used in eradication projects. The program shall be designed to provide the greatest amount of information practicable to affected citizens. The department shall conduct outreach efforts to inform the public about the existence of this program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Proof of Ownership [5030. - 5035.]

5030.

Upon probable cause to believe a person buying, selling, or transporting a shipment of plant material intended to be marketed for commercial purposes is in violation of this division, proof of ownership of the plant material shall be made available for inspection upon request of the director, the commissioner, or any peace officer. If the director or the commissioner has probable cause to believe that a person is in unlawful possession of any shipment of plant material, he or she may request a peace officer to stop the vehicle for inspection. The record of proof of ownership shall contain the following information:

(a) The name, address, telephone number, and signature of the seller or the seller’s authorized representative.

(b) The name, address, and telephone number of the buyer, or consignee if the commodity has not been sold.

(c) The common or generic name and quantity of the commodity.

(d) The name of the country, state, or territory where the commodity was grown.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 806, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5031.

It is unlawful for any person to knowingly falsify, misrepresent, or cause to be falsified or misrepresented, any information in a record intended to show proof of ownership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 806, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5032.

The director or commissioner may compile information and make any necessary investigations relative to suspected violations of this division. The director or commissioner may call and conduct a hearing in furtherance of the investigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 806, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5033.

The person in custody of any records containing information required pursuant to Section 5030 shall exhibit those records upon a demand therefor by the director or commissioner, as their designees, or by a peace officer. The records may include, but are not limited to, certificates of inspection or treatment, bills of sale or consignment, truck invoices, or bills of lading.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 806, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5034.

At the time of the hearing, the director or commissioner may take any of the following actions:

(a) Administer oaths and take testimony.

(b) Issue subpoenas that compel the attendance of any witness before the director or commissioner, together with the production of all relevant documents.

(c) Compel disclosure by witnesses of all facts that are known to them relative to the matter under investigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 806, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5035.

Any party that disobeys any order or subpoena of the director is subject to Section 11188 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 806, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. County Administration [5101. - 5105.]

5101.

Each commissioner is an enforcing officer of all laws and regulations which relate to the prevention of the introduction into, or the spread within, the state of pests. He is, as to such activities, under the supervision of the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5102.

Each commissioner and each qualified representative of the commissioner is a state plant quarantine officer for the following purposes:

(a) Certifying to the pest condition or pest treatment of shipments, if certification as a condition of movement or entry is officially required.

(b) Enforcing laws and regulations which relate to plant quarantine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

5103.

Any interested person that is aggrieved by any action or order of a commissioner may appeal in writing to the director within five days after notice of action or order if no other time limit is prescribed within which to appeal from such action or order. No appeal may be taken from any authorized summary action of the commissioner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5104.

The director shall hear any appeal from an action or order of a commissioner within 10 days after the receipt of the appeal upon notice to all interested parties. His decision shall be final.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5105.

Pending decision after appeal, action by the commissioner on the case under appeal shall be suspended by the director. The refusal of any commissioner to carry out the orders and directions of the director which are issued in connection with any appeal is neglect of duty.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Certification of Plant Shipments [5201. - 5209.]

5201.

As used in this chapter, “certificate” means the certification by a commissioner, deputy commissioner, or inspector of the pest condition or treatment of any shipment of plants.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5202.

The board of supervisors of any county may establish a schedule of fees for any or all classes of certificates to be paid by shippers that request such certificates.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5203.

No fee shall be charged for certification required by any law, regulation, or requirement of the United States or of this state or by any ordinance, regulation, or requirement of any county of this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5204.

The schedule of fees for the certificates shall be based upon the approximate cost of the inspection.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5205.

A commissioner shall make such inspections as may be necessary to determine the facts which are required by the state or country of intended destination and shall issue a certificate that states the facts which are determined upon receipt of the scheduled fee for a certificate or, if no scheduled fee has been established, upon request of the shipper.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5206.

The board of supervisors of any county may designate any place within the county as a fumigation or treatment station for the purpose of enabling the commissioner to inspect plant shipments for certificates, if fumigation or other treatment is required by the state or country of destination as a condition of shipment to such state or country.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5207.

If the board of supervisors designates a place as a fumigation or treatment station, the commissioner shall inspect plant shipments at the stations, for shipment to other states or countries which require fumigation or treatment as a condition of shipment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5208.

It is unlawful for any person to alter, deface, or wrongfully use a certificate issued pursuant to any provision of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5209.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any violation of this chapter is an infraction punishable by a fine of seventy-five dollars ($75) for the first offense and is a misdemeanor for a second or subsequent offense within three years of a prior conviction of a violation of this chapter.

(b) (1) Any use by any person of a false or invalid certificate for the purpose of certification pursuant to this chapter is a misdemeanor.

(2) For the purpose of this section, “false certificate” means a document, as defined in Section 5201, that has not been issued by a commissioner, deputy commissioner, or inspector.

(3) For the purposes of this section, “invalid certificate” means a document, as defined in Section 5201, that is based upon false information supplied to the commissioner, deputy commissioner, or inspector which is essential to the issuance of the certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 752, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Newly Discovered Pests [5251. - 5255.]

5251.

Upon the discovery of any pest, the director shall immediately report the discovery to the commissioner of the county in which the pest is found.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5252.

The director shall furnish to the commissioner a statement as to the best known means or methods for eradicating or controlling the discovered pest and advise him of the procedure or treatment to prevent the further spread of the pest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5253.

The commissioner shall disseminate all or any portion of the statement in whatever manner he may deem is best suited to inform persons that own or have charge or possession of any premises or appliances within the county where there is a probability of the presence of the pest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5254.

In any county where there is no commissioner, or if the director finds that the commissioner has failed or neglected to use all reasonable means to effect the control or eradication of any discovered pest, the director may undertake the control or eradication of the pest. He may exercise any power or authority which is conferred on the commissioner by this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5255.

In any proceeding which is commenced pursuant to Section 5254, any duty, jurisdiction, or authority which is conferred on the commissioner by this division is conferred or imposed upon and transferred to the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Invasive Pest Planning [5260. - 5267.]

5260.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) California is home to more species of plants and animals in the world and the highest number of species found nowhere else in the world.

(b) The state’s plants and animals coexist to create the complex ecosystems upon which so much of the state’s people and economy depend.

(c) Global travel, global trade, and climate change are introducing invasive animals, plants, insects, and plant and animal diseases to California.

(d) Global warming is changing ecosystems at an unprecedented pace. These
 changes bring invasive species and pests that pose direct threats to the state’s native and agricultural biodiversity.

(e) The State of California should undertake advance planning on whether and how to address those invasive animals, plants, insects, and plant and animal diseases that are a threat to the state’s agriculture, environment, or economy.

(f) The Legislature fully recognizes that any prediction of which invasive pests will enter California cannot be precise because of the many entry mechanisms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 870, Sec. 1.   (AB 2470)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5260.5.

For purposes of this chapter, “invasive pests” means animals, plants, insects, and plant and animal diseases or groups of those animals, plants, insects, and plant and animal diseases, including seeds, eggs, spores, or other matter capable of propagation, where introduction into California would or would likely cause economic or environmental harm. “Invasive pests” does not include agricultural crops, livestock, or poultry generally recognized by the department or the United States Department of Agriculture as suitable to be grown or raised in the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5261.

The department shall develop and maintain a list of invasive pests that have a reasonable likelihood of entering California for which a detection, exclusion, eradication, control, or management action by the state might be appropriate. In developing the list, the department shall consider any invasive pests identified by the federal or state government for which a detection, exclusion, eradication, control, or management action might be undertaken.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5262.
